Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2204
Pilot project; created; department; duties; termination of project.

A pilot project is created to provide family finding services within at least two service areas. The department shall contract with providers of family finding services to carry out the family finding services pilot project. A provider may contract within multiple service areas. Each contracting provider shall be trained in and implement the steps described in section 43-2203. The family finding services pilot project shall terminate on June 30, 2019.

Laws 2015, LB243, § 4;

Laws 2022, LB1173, § 9.